South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Massage Therapy Board, relating to Massage Therapy Board, designated as Regulation Document Number 5400, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Board of Massage Therapy proposes to amend its regulations to update and revise regulations regarding massage therapy, to include but not be limited to endorsement, license renewal, massage therapy establishments and sole practitioner establishments. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on April 25, 2025. ----XX----